Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2 STUDENT OBLIGATIONS AND INSTITUTIONAL LOANS
23-3.1-206.9. Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program - administration - fund - policies.

There is hereby created the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program for the purpose of increasing access to postsecondary education. The Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program shall be implemented and administered by the authority. A scholarship under the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program may be awarded only to an undergraduate student who, each year:

Attends a state institution of higher education or a participating private institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (8) and is eligible to receive a stipend pursuant to article 18 of this title; or

Attends a local district college that is part of a local college district organized pursuant to article 71 of this title; or

Attends an area technical college, as defined in section 23-60-103 (1), and is earning postsecondary credits that may be transferred into an associate degree program at a community college or into a degree program at a four-year institution of higher education as provided in section 23-1-108 (7) and the state credit transfer policies established by the Colorado commission on higher education; and

Demonstrates financial need through the student's eligibility for the federal Pell grant or its successor program; and

Meets any other eligibility requirements established by the board, which shall include but need not be limited to requiring the student to maintain a high school cumulative grade point average of at least 2.5.

The Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund, which is hereby created, shall consist of moneys deposited into the fund by the authority, any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly, and any gifts, grants, and donations received by the authority for the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program. Moneys deposited into the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund shall be deemed to be trust funds and shall be administered by the authority and shall be used for the direct and indirect costs of implementing and administering, including marketing, the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program and may be used for need-based financial aid. Annual expenditures on direct marketing shall not exceed five percent of the annual revenue of the trust. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or to any other fund. Any moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund shall be subject to annual appropriation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the contrary, on July 1, 2009, of moneys credited to the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund other than moneys transferred from the student loan guarantee fund created in section 23-3.1-107 (1)(a), the state treasurer shall deduct fifteen million dollars from the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the contrary, of moneys credited to the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund other than moneys transferred from the student loan guarantee fund created in section 23-3.1-107 (1)(a), the state treasurer shall deduct twenty-nine million eight hundred thousand dollars from the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund and transfer such sum to the general fund if the revenue estimate prepared in June of 2010 in accordance with section 24-75-201.3 (2), C.R.S., indicates for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2010, that general fund expenditures for that fiscal year based on appropriations enacted by law will result in the use of more than three-eighths of the reserve required by section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d), C.R.S., or if the revenue estimate prepared in September or December of 2010 or in March or June of 2011 in accordance with section 24-75-201.3 (2), C.R.S., indicates for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2010, that general fund expenditures for that fiscal year based on appropriations then in effect will result in the use of more than three-eighths of the reserve required by section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d), C.R.S.; however, said amount shall be deducted and transferred by the state treasurer only once pursuant to this paragraph (c).

The board shall adopt any policies necessary for the implementation and administration of the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program, which shall include but need not be limited to implementing the program for the high school graduating class of 2008, providing awards to both part-time and full-time students, and specifying that a scholarship under the program shall only be paid to a student for up to five academic years. The board shall develop an application for the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program that shall be returned as specified by the board. The application shall include the requirements for and the disqualifications from the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program. The policies adopted by the board for the implementation and administration of the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program shall be approved by the executive director.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before February 1 of each year, the board shall report to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, on the status of the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the financial status of the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund, the amount of money annually spent on administration, the average scholarship award amount, and the number of students participating in the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 166, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(1), (1)(c), (2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 205, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-279), ch. 367, p. 1926, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1383), ch. 361, p. 1713, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2016:

(1)(a)(III) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 144, § 15, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (HB 17-1251), ch. 253, p. 1059, § 6, effective August 9.

23-3.1-207. Notes.

The authority may issue from time to time its negotiable notes for any of its purposes as provided in this part 2, including purchase of student obligations or the making of student obligations or institutional loans, and may renew from time to time any notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge other obligations then outstanding and partly for any other purpose. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds.

Any resolution authorizing notes of the authority or any issue of such notes may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue of bonds, and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds.

All such notes shall be payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or from the revenues of the authority or other moneys available for such payment and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations outstanding at the time of issuance of such notes.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 816, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 626, § 23, effective April 10.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 568, § 16, effective July 1.

23-3.1-208. Bonds.

The authority may issue from time to time its bonds for its purposes as provided in this part 2, including but not limited to purchasing or making student obligations or making institutional loans. The authority may not undertake the financing of the making or purchasing of student obligations unless, prior to the issuance of any bonds or notes, the board finds that there is insufficient access to student obligations from normal private market sources and that the financing will help alleviate such insufficient access.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 568, § 17, effective July 1, 2004.)

In anticipation of the sale of its bonds, the authority may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew the same from time to time. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues of the authority or other moneys available for payments and not otherwise pledged or from proceeds of the sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued in the same manner as bonds. Such notes and the resolution authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a bond resolution of the authority contains.

All bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts of the authority as designated in the resolution of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as designated in a trust indenture authorized by the authority which shall name a bank or trust company as trustee or out of other moneys available for payments and not otherwise pledged.

Bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at such times, may be in such form and denominations and include such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registerable either as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Colorado, may bear interest at such fixed or variable rate or rates per annum as determined by the authority or in accordance with methods approved by the authority without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law of this state, may be evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the authority, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature appears on the bonds, which may be either an officer of the authority or an officer of the trustee authenticating the same, may be in the form of coupon bonds which have attached interest coupons bearing the facsimile signature of an authorized officer of the authority, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this part 2, all as provided in the resolution of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as provided in a trust indenture authorized by the authority.

If deemed advisable by the authority, there may be retained in the resolution or the trust indenture under which any bonds of the authority are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part of said bonds as may be specified in such resolution or in such trust indenture, at such price or prices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such resolution or in such trust indenture. Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed to confer on the authority the right or option to redeem any bonds except as provided in the resolution or in such trust indenture under which they are issued.

The bonds or notes of the authority may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices, in such manner, and at such times as determined by the authority, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums, and commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of bonds or notes. The power to fix the date of sale of bonds and notes, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds and notes, and to take all other necessary action to sell and deliver bonds and notes may be delegated to the executive officer by resolution of the authority. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive bonds.

Any outstanding bonds of the authority may be refunded or advance refunded at any time and from time to time by the authority by the issuance of its bonds for such purpose in a principal amount determined by the authority, which may include interest accrued or to accrue with or without giving effect to investment income and other expenses necessary to be paid in connection with such issuance.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded have then matured or will mature thereafter, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds of such sale for the payment of the bonds to be refunded or by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded with the consent of the holders of the bonds to be so refunded, regardless of whether or not the bonds proposed to be refunded are payable on the same date or different dates or are due serially or otherwise.

The proceeds of any such bonds issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of such outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof and, pending such application, may be placed in escrow to be applied to such purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on such date as may be determined by the authority. Any such escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested and reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., maturing at such time or times as are appropriate to assure the prompt payment as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profit, if any, earned or realized on any such investment may also be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the payment of the outstanding bonds or notes to be so refunded or to the payment of principal and interest on the refunding bonds or for any other purpose under this part 2. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of such proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments may be returned to the authority for use by it in any lawful manner.

All such refunding bonds shall be subject to the provisions of this part 2 in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued pursuant to this part 2.

The proceeds of any bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations may be used and applied to the payment of financing costs, including legal, underwriting and investment banking, accounting, and other similar costs; the funding of any reserve funds deemed necessary or advisable by the authority; interest on such bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations for a period not to exceed three years; and all other necessary and incidental costs and expenses.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 816, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1090, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 83:

(1)(a) amended, p. 785, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 84:

(1) R&RE, p. 626, § 24, effective April 10.

L. 89:

(5)(b)(II) amended, p. 1108, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a) amended, p. 586, § 1, effective March 4.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 130, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 568, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 514, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 206, § 5, effective August 5.

23-3.1-209. Negotiability of bonds.

All bonds and any interest coupons applicable to such bonds are hereby declared and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 818, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 627, § 25, effective April 10.

23-3.1-210. Security for bonds and notes.

The principal and interest on any bonds or notes issued by the authority may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee. Such trust indenture or the resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations may pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues or assets of the authority, including, without limitation, student obligations, student obligation commitments, institutional loans, moneys deposited or pledged by or on behalf of one or more institutions of higher education, moneys deposited or pledged by the division, temporary loans, contracts, agreements, and other security or investment obligations, the fees or charges made or received by the authority, the moneys received in payment of student obligations and institutional loans and interest on such moneys, including the proceeds of insurance on such obligations and loans and any other moneys received or due to be received by the authority.

Such trust indenture or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any of the bonds or notes as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the purposes to which proceeds of the bonds or notes may be applied, the disposition or pledging of the revenues or assets of the authority, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional bonds or notes, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. Any such trust indenture or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any bonds or notes and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders.

In addition, any such trust indenture or resolution may contain such other provision as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the holders of any bonds or notes, including but not limited to provisions for insurance, letters of credit, standby credit agreements, take-out commitments, or other forms of credit insuring against default or guaranteeing timely payment with respect to student obligations, institutional loans, or bonds. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such indenture or resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds or notes or from any other funds available to the authority.

Any pledge made by the authority, by one or more institutions of higher education, by a nonprofit corporation acting on behalf of one or more institutions of higher education, or by the division shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues and moneys so pledged and thereafter received by or otherwise credited to such pledging parties shall immediately be subject to lien of such pledge without any physical delivery, filing, or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall have priority over any and all other obligations and liabilities of such pledging parties, subject to any contractual covenants by the pledging parties and any prior pledges and liens, and shall be valid, binding, and enforceable against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against such pledging parties, irrespective of whether such claiming parties have notice of such lien. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded. Each pledge, agreement, and indenture made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue to be effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same are made has been fully paid or provision for such payment duly made.

In the event of default in any such payment or in any agreements of the authority made as part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in any trust indenture executed as security for such bonds, said payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, or either of such remedies.

Any bank or trust company that may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues or other moneys may furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as required by the authority.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 818, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(a), (1)(c), and (2)(a) amended, p. 627, § 26, effective April 10.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (2), and (3) amended, p. 570, § 18, effective July 1.

23-3.1-211. Personal liability.

Neither the members of the board, employees or agents of the authority, nor any person executing the bonds or notes or advance payment contracts shall be liable personally on bonds or notes or advance payment contracts or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof or as a result of the prepaid expense program.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 427, § 5, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1282, § 9, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 572, § 19, effective July 1.

23-3.1-212. Purchase.

The authority may purchase its bonds or notes out of any available funds. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such bonds or notes, subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders or noteholders.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.1-213. Payment of bonds and advance payment contracts - limited liability of state.

Bonds and notes issued by the authority shall be payable solely from the funds provided for in this part 2 and shall not otherwise constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall the state otherwise be liable on such bonds and notes, nor shall such bonds or notes constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state. The issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this part 2 shall not obligate the state or empower the authority, directly, indirectly, or contingently, to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments, to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments, or to make any appropriation for their payment, and such appropriation, levy, or collection is prohibited.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed to authorize the authority to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of Colorado; and all bonds issued by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 are payable and shall state that they are payable solely from the funds pledged for their payment in accordance with the resolution authorizing their issuance or with any trust indenture executed as security for such bonds and are not otherwise a debt or liability of the state of Colorado.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, the state shall not be liable in any event for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority or for the performance of any pledge, obligation, or agreement of any kind whatsoever that may be undertaken by the authority. No breach of any such pledge, obligation, or agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon the state, except from funds specifically pledged by the state, or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, advance payment contracts and the benefits due thereunder shall be payable solely from the moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund, and shall not otherwise constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall the state otherwise be liable on such advance payment contracts, nor shall such advance payment contracts constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state. Advance payment contracts and the benefits due thereunder shall be payable by the authority solely from moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund and are not payable from or secured in any way by other moneys or accounts of the authority.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) added, p. 428, § 6, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1282, § 10, effective May 26.

23-3.1-214. Exemption from taxation - securities law.

The income or other revenues of the authority, including income earned on the investment of moneys in the prepaid expense and the savings trust funds, all properties at any time owned by the authority, any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to this part 2, the transfer of and the income, including any profit made on sale, from any such bonds, notes, or other obligations, and all trust indentures and other documents issued in connection with such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be exempt at all times from all taxation and assessments in the state of Colorado. In the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds by the authority, the board may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for interest on such bonds. Bonds issued by the authority shall also be exempt from the provisions of article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 785, § 3, effective April 29.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 428, § 7, effective April 22.

23-3.1-215. Fees.

All expenses of the authority incurred in carrying out the provisions of this part 2 shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this part 2, and no liability shall be incurred by the authority beyond the moneys which are provided pursuant to this part 2. For the purposes of meeting the necessary expenses of initial organization and operation until such date as the authority derives moneys from funds provided pursuant to this part 2, the authority may borrow such moneys as may be required for the necessary expenses of organization and operation. Such borrowed moneys shall be repaid within a reasonable time after the authority receives funds provided pursuant to this part 2.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 821, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.1-216. Investment of funds.

Moneys of the authority held in the collegeinvest fund created in section 23-3.1-205.4 shall be invested as provided in section 23-3.1-205.4 (3). Other moneys of the authority may be invested in property or securities in which the state treasurer may legally invest moneys subject to his or her control. The authority may sell the securities and may deposit the securities in a trust bank within or without the state. Any moneys deposited in a banking institution or a depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., shall be secured in such a manner and subject to the terms and conditions as the board may determine, with or without payment of any interest on the deposit, including, without limitation, time deposits evidenced by certificates of deposit.

The board may direct a corporate trustee that holds moneys of the authority pursuant to a trust indenture or other agreement between the trustee and the authority to invest or reinvest the moneys in any investments, other than those specified in subsection (1) of this section, if the board determines that, as of the date of the determination, the investment meets the standards for investments established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S.

In addition to the investments otherwise permitted in this part 2, the state treasurer may invest moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund in the following:

State and municipal bonds;

Corporate notes, bonds, and debentures, whether or not convertible, to the extent provided for in paragraph (d) of this subsection (3);

Participation agreements with life insurance companies;

Common or preferred stock; except that:

No investment of moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund in common or preferred stock, or both, of any corporation shall be of an amount that exceeds five percent of the market value of investable assets of the trust fund; except that, such amount may exceed five percent, for a period not to exceed sixty consecutive days;

The prepaid expense trust fund shall not acquire more than five percent of the outstanding stock or bonds of any single corporation; and

The aggregate amount of moneys of the prepaid expense trust fund invested in common or preferred stock, or in corporate bonds, notes, or debentures that are convertible into common or preferred stock, or in investment trust shares shall not exceed sixty percent of the market value of investable assets of the prepaid expense trust fund; except that such market value of investable assets may exceed sixty percent, by not more than five percent, for a period not to exceed sixty consecutive days;

Investments in the form of mutual funds; and

Any guaranteed investment contract, guaranteed interest contract, annuity contract, or funding agreement if the board determines by resolution that:

Such contract or agreement meets the standard for investments established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S.;

The income on such contract or agreement is at least comparable to the income then available on the other investments permitted in this section; and

Such contract or agreement will assist the authority in maintaining an actuarially sound trust fund.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 821, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1090, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 786, § 4, effective April 29.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1108, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) added, p. 428, § 8, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1283, § 11, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 153, § 65, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 572, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 206, § 6, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 04-1126 and House Bill 04-1350 were harmonized.

23-3.1-217. Proceeds as trust funds.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, all moneys received pursuant to this part 2, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations or as revenues or receipts, including moneys received under advance payment contracts shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this part 2. Any officer, bank, or trust company with which such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this part 2, subject to such policies and guidelines as the authority and the resolution authorizing the bonds, notes, or other obligations of any issue or the trust indenture securing such obligations provides.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 821, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 429, § 9, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1285, § 12, effective May 26.

23-3.1-217.5. Claims of creditors - exemption.

Moneys credited to or expended from the prepaid expense trust fund by or on behalf of a purchaser or qualified beneficiary of an advance payment contract made under this part 2, which contract has not been terminated, are exempt from all claims of creditors of the purchaser, the qualified beneficiary, or the authority.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 429, § 10, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1285, § 13, effective May 26.

23-3.1-218. Agreement of the state not to limit or alter rights of obligees.

The state hereby pledges to and agrees with the holders of any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this part 2 and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority, with state-supported institutions of higher education, or with the division pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds, notes, or other obligations authorized and issued pursuant to this part 2 and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this part 2, and that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested in any state-supported institution of higher education or in the division to fulfill the terms of any contracts made with the authority and with the parties who may enter into contracts with such institutions of higher education or with the division pursuant to this part 2. The state further agrees that it will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations of such parties until such bonds, notes, and other obligations, together with interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installment of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority, the state-supported institutions of higher education, or the division. Nothing in this part 2 precludes such limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision is made by law for the protection of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority or those entering into such contracts with the authority or the authority under any contract with a state-supported institution of higher education or with the division. The authority may include this pledge and undertaking for the state in such bonds, notes, or other obligations and in such contracts.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 821, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 628, § 27, effective April 10.

23-3.1-219. Enforcement of rights of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued pursuant to this part 2 or a trustee under a trust agreement or trust indenture entered into pursuant to this part 2, except to the extent that his rights are restricted by any bond resolution, may protect and enforce, by any suitable form of legal proceedings, any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond resolution. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the authority required by this part 2 or the bond resolution and to enjoin unlawful activities.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 18.

23-3.1-220. Bonds eligible for investment.

All banks, bankers, trust companies, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance companies and associations, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds, notes, or other obligations, issued pursuant to this part 2. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds, notes, or other obligations only if said bonds, notes, or other obligations satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1127, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 572, § 21, effective July 1.

23-3.1-221. Account of activities - receipts for expenditures - report - audit.

The authority shall keep an accurate account of all its activities and of all its receipts and expenditures and shall report annually on such activities, receipts, and expenditures in the month of February to its members, to the governor, to the commission, and to the state auditor in a form prescribed by the controller. Also included in the report shall be any recommendations with reference to additional legislation, a financial analysis of the actuarial soundness of the prepaid expense trust fund if one was prepared, an accounting of any loans or transfers approved pursuant to section 23-3.1-205.4 (4), and other action that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority. The state auditor may investigate the affairs of the authority and may examine the properties and records of the authority, and the controller may prescribe methods of accounting and the rendering of periodical reports in relation to undertakings by the authority. The department of higher education shall adopt and prepare a budget for the authority for the next fiscal year. Beginning July 1, 2000, the fiscal year of the authority shall begin on July 1 and shall end on June 30. The authority shall not be required to comply with fiscal rules of the state of Colorado until July 1, 2000.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 341, § 5, effective March 29; entire section amended, p. 1091, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 430, § 11, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1286, § 14, effective May 26.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 552, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 572, § 22, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section in House Bill 81-1215 and House Bill 81-1020 were harmonized.

23-3.1-222. Federal social security act.

The authority may take such action as it deems appropriate to enable its employees to come within the provisions and obtain the benefits of the federal "Social Security Act", as from time to time amended.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.1-223. Powers of authority not restricted.

This part 2 shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the authority might otherwise have under any laws of this state but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed to deprive the state and its political subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority or to impair any power over such properties of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 1.